Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-115 Laws applicable. (a) No
insurance laws of this State other than those contained in this article, or
contained in specific references contained in this section or article, shall
apply to captive insurance companies.

(b) Sections 431:3-302 to 431:3-304.5,
431:3-307, 431:3-401 to 431:3-408, and 431:3-414; articles 1, 2, 4A, 5, 6, 9A,
9B, 9C, 11, 11A, and 15; and chapter 431K shall apply to risk retention captive
insurance companies.

(c) Articles 1, 2, 6, and 15 shall apply to
class 5 companies.

(d) If any of the laws specified in this
section are inconsistent with this article, this article shall apply unless the
commissioner by rule or order determines otherwise on a case-by-case basis.

(e) The application of the foregoing
provisions shall not diminish the commissioner's authority for exemption as may
be contained therein or as may be deemed appropriate under the circumstances.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 190, §§5, 10; am L 1997, c 358, §§1, 2;
am L 1998, c 150, §6; am L 1999, c 302, §7; am L 2000, c 36, §6 and c 133, §7;
am L 2003, c 209, §9; am L 2012, c 253, §19; am L 2013, c 190, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next